Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201022-172.01
Polk.

The county of Polk is bounded as follows:
Beginning at the southwest corner of township 13 north, range 4 west; thence
north, and on the west line of range 4 west, to the southwest corner of the
northwest quarter of section 19, township 14 north, range 4 west of the sixth
principal meridian; thence north 1 degree, 46 minutes, 44 seconds west (assumed
bearing), and on the west line of the northwest quarter of said section 19,
2132.77 feet to the thread of stream of the south channel of the Platte River;
the next 35 courses on said thread of stream; thence south 84 degrees, 28
minutes, 19 seconds east, 60.66 feet; thence north 29 degrees, 30 minutes,
32 seconds east, 130.51 feet; thence south 70 degrees, 11 minutes, 42 seconds
east, 131.06 feet; thence north 40 degrees, 23 minutes, 29 seconds east, 27.01
feet; thence north 31 degrees, 48 minutes, 41 seconds west, 130.23 feet; thence
north 38 degrees, 43 minutes, 26 seconds east, 153.67 feet; thence south 71
degrees, 56 minutes, 45 seconds east, 194.99 feet; thence north 64 degrees,
11 minutes, 17 seconds east, 153.41 feet; thence north 56 degrees, 6 minutes,
19 seconds east, 108.65 feet; thence north 9 degrees, 37 minutes, 55 seconds
east, 60.66 feet; thence north 55 degrees, 53 minutes, 26 seconds east, 184.62
feet; thence south 89 degrees, 4 minutes, 41 seconds east, 267.50 feet; thence
north 22 degrees, 39 minutes, 9 seconds east, 124.70 feet; thence north 53
degrees, 36 minutes, 57 seconds east, 149.13 feet; thence north 37 degrees,
5 minutes, 51 seconds west, 124.10 feet; thence north 47 degrees, 57 minutes,
2 seconds east, 65.57 feet; thence south 36 degrees, 3 minutes, 53 seconds
east, 301.87 feet; thence north 46 degrees, 48 minutes, 49 seconds east, 115.81
feet; thence north 4 degrees, 29 minutes, 24 seconds west, 72.26 feet; thence
north 59 degrees, 37 minutes, 54 seconds east, 102.28 feet; thence north 6
degrees, 30 minutes, 41 seconds west, 317.85 feet; thence north 37 degrees,
40 minutes, 28 seconds east, 182.50 feet; thence north 31 degrees, 10 minutes,
30 seconds west, 119.52 feet; thence north 52 degrees, 46 minutes, 4 seconds
east, 95.33 feet; thence north 73 degrees, 10 minutes, 0 seconds east, 64.89
feet; thence south 16 degrees, 50 minutes, 0 seconds east, 109.48 feet; thence
south 80 degrees, 32 minutes, 59 seconds east, 109.60 feet; thence north 23
degrees, 1 minute, 57 seconds east, 150.01 feet; thence north 56 degrees,
56 minutes, 49 seconds east, 162.33 feet; thence north 2 degrees, 13 minutes,
20 seconds east, 105.50 feet; thence north 55 degrees, 41 minutes, 50 seconds
east, 367.42 feet; thence north 11 degrees, 8 minutes, 4 seconds east, 126.97
feet; thence north 60 degrees, 16 minutes, 1 second east, 247.07 feet; thence
north 25 degrees, 36 minutes, 31 seconds east, 486.91 feet; thence south 86
degrees, 4 minutes, 13 seconds east, 477.93 feet and ending at a point that
is perpendicular to the northeast corner of said section 19; thence continuing
on the county line between Polk and Merrick counties adjacent to section 17
and section 8, township 14 north, range 4 west of the sixth principal meridian,
Polk County, Nebraska, described as follows: Commencing at the southwest corner
of said section 17, and assuming the north line of section 19, township 14
north, range 4 west to have a bearing of north 87 degrees, 50 minutes, 16
seconds east; thence north 43 degrees, 19 minutes, 4 seconds west, 2576.37
feet to the point of beginning; thence north 46 degrees, 40 minutes, 56 seconds
east, 922.93 feet; thence north 57 degrees, 57 minutes, 4 seconds east, 777.42
feet; thence north 22 degrees, 53 minutes, 36 seconds east, 341.40 feet; thence
north 52 degrees, 26 minutes, 41 seconds east, 268.04 feet; thence north 27
degrees, 48 minutes, 39 seconds east, 466.41 feet; thence north 42 degrees,
10 minutes, 35 seconds east, 496.04 feet; thence north 52 degrees, 16 minutes,
36 seconds east, 297.07 feet; thence north 31 degrees, 18 minutes, 19 seconds
east, 243.80 feet; thence north 49 degrees, 41 minutes, 58 seconds east, 265.23
feet; thence north 60 degrees, 19 minutes, 0 seconds east, 350.21 feet; thence
north 44 degrees, 11 minutes, 59 seconds west, 543.34 feet; thence north 51
degrees, 2 minutes, 28 seconds east, 2051.44 feet; thence north 32 degrees,
40 minutes, 47 seconds west, 482.44 feet; thence north 42 degrees, 17 minutes,
15 seconds east, 177.59 feet; thence north 8 degrees, 12 minutes, 7 seconds
east, 284.77 feet; thence north 59 degrees, 57 minutes, 4 seconds east, 806.17
feet; thence north 79 degrees, 30 minutes, 49 seconds east, 393.73 feet; thence
south 66 degrees, 48 minutes, 41 seconds east, 90.99 feet; thence north 75
degrees, 13 minutes, 56 seconds east, 224.90 feet; thence north 51 degrees,
45 minutes, 30 seconds east, 177.92 feet; thence north 28 degrees, 41 minutes,
5 seconds east, 174.26 feet to a point that is perpendicular to the northeast
corner of government lot 4 of said section 8; thence north 36 degrees, 51
minutes, 23 seconds west, and perpendicular to the geographical centerline
of the Platte River, 1242.20 feet and ending at the geographical centerline
of said Platte River; thence continuing on the county line between Polk and
Merrick counties adjacent to section 9, township 14 north, range 4 west of
the sixth principal meridian, Polk County, Nebraska, described as follows:
Commencing at the southwest corner of government lot 4 in said section 9,
and assuming the south line of the southwest quarter of said section 9 to
have a bearing of south 89 degrees, 53 minutes, 34 seconds west; thence north
0 degrees, 16 minutes, 54 seconds east, and on the west line of government
lots 4 and 3, 1487.75 feet to the original meander line of the Platte River;
thence north 35 degrees, 17 minutes, 2 seconds west, and perpendicular to
the geographical centerline of said Platte River, 2859.02 feet to the point
of beginning, said point being on said geographical centerline; thence north
54 degrees, 42 minutes, 58 seconds east, and on said geographical centerline,
888.27 feet; thence north 58 degrees, 11 minutes, 51 seconds east, and on
said geographical centerline, 1487.03 feet; thence north 40 degrees, 30 minutes,
0 seconds east, and on said geographical centerline, 1281.69 feet and ending
at a point that is perpendicular to the northwest corner of government lot
1 in said section 9; thence continuing on the county line between Polk and
Merrick counties adjacent to section 4, township 14 north, range 4 west of
the sixth principal meridian, Polk County, Nebraska, described as follows:
Commencing at the southeast corner of government lot 5 in said section 4,
and assuming the east line of government lots 3 and 5 in said section 4 to
have a bearing of south 0 degrees, 5 minutes, 41 seconds east; thence south
89 degrees, 24 minutes, 52 seconds west, and on the south line of government
lots 5 and 4, 3102.76 feet to a point on the original south meander line of
the Platte River; thence north 49 degrees, 30 minutes, 0 seconds west, and
perpendicular to the geographical centerline of said Platte River, 1321.25
feet to the point of beginning, said point being on the geographical centerline
of said Platte River, the next 7 courses on said centerline; thence north
40 degrees, 30 minutes, 0 seconds east, 348.74 feet to a three-fourths seconds
rebar with cap; thence north 39 degrees, 16 minutes, 11 seconds east, 1420.98
feet to a three-fourths seconds rebar with cap; thence north 38 degrees, 14
minutes, 59 seconds east, 1222.76 feet to a three-fourths seconds rebar with
cap; thence north 36 degrees, 4 minutes, 35 seconds east, 426.21 feet to a
three-fourths seconds rebar with cap; thence north 42 degrees, 8 minutes,
26 seconds east, 779.07 feet to a three-fourths seconds rebar with cap; thence
north 44 degrees, 45 minutes, 1 second east, 505.14 feet to a three-fourths
seconds rebar with cap; thence north 42 degrees, 56 minutes, 58 seconds east,
685.04 feet and ending at a point that is perpendicular to the northeast corner
of government lot 2 in said section 4; thence continuing on the county line
between Polk and Merrick counties adjacent to section 3, township 14 north,
range 4 west of the sixth principal meridian, Polk County, Nebraska, described
as follows: Commencing at the northeast corner of government lot 2 in said
section 4, and assuming the east line of said government lot 2 to have a bearing
of south 0 degrees, 5 minutes, 41 seconds east; thence north 47 degrees, 3
minutes, 2 seconds west, and perpendicular to the geographical centerline
of the Platte River, 848.52 feet to the point of beginning, said point being
on said geographical centerline; thence north 42 degrees, 56 minutes, 58 seconds
east, and on said geographical centerline, 750.96 feet; thence north 33 degrees,
22 minutes, 23 seconds east, and on said geographical centerline, 434.94 feet
and ending at a point that is perpendicular to the northwesterly corner of
government lot 4 in said section 3; thence continuing on the county line between
Polk and Merrick counties adjacent to section 34, township 15 north, range
4 west of the sixth principal meridian, Polk County, Nebraska, described as
follows: Commencing at the southwest corner of the southeast quarter of section
34, and assuming the south line of said southeast quarter to have a bearing
of north 89 degrees, 10 minutes, 38 seconds east; thence south 88 degrees,
55 minutes, 33 seconds west, 1780.73 feet to the calculated meander corner;
thence north 56 degrees, 37 minutes, 37 seconds west, and perpendicular to
the geographical centerline of the Platte River, 912.40 feet to the point
of beginning; the next 13 courses on the geographical centerline of said Platte
River; thence north 33 degrees, 22 minutes, 23 seconds east, 148.31 feet;
thence north 42 degrees, 32 minutes, 16 seconds east, 450.87 feet; thence
north 35 degrees, 36 minutes, 3 seconds east, 461.73 feet; thence north 21
degrees, 44 minutes, 33 seconds east, 652.02 feet; thence north 22 degrees,
47 minutes, 50 seconds east, 723.43 feet; thence north 17 degrees, 25 minutes,
48 seconds east, 480.50 feet; thence north 18 degrees, 58 minutes, 22 seconds
east, 315.96 feet; thence north 28 degrees, 41 minutes, 27 seconds east, 513.70
feet; thence north 10 degrees, 53 minutes, 32 seconds east, 365.66 feet; thence
north 31 degrees, 12 minutes, 36 seconds east, 686.04 feet; thence north 29
degrees, 6 minutes, 28 seconds east, 479.52 feet; thence north 11 degrees,
9 minutes, 24 seconds east, 688.60 feet; thence north 35 degrees, 54 minutes,
48 seconds east, 1209.26 feet and ending at a point that is perpendicular
to the meander corner, the northeast corner of the northeast quarter of section
34, township 15 north, range 4 west of the sixth principal meridian, Polk
County, Nebraska; thence continuing on the county line between Polk and Merrick
counties adjacent to sections 26 and 23, township 15 north, range 4 west of
the sixth principal meridian, Polk County, Nebraska, described as follows:
Commencing at the southwest corner of the southwest quarter of section 26,
and assuming the south line of said southwest quarter to have a bearing of
south 89 degrees, 32 minutes, 23 seconds west; thence north 53 degrees, 20
minutes, 6 seconds west, 2455.61 feet to the point of beginning, said point
being on the geographical centerline of the Platte River; the next 14 courses
on said geographical centerline; thence north 29 degrees, 1 minute, 35 seconds
east, 191.87 feet; thence north 41 degrees, 18 minutes, 40 seconds east, 943.72
feet; thence north 42 degrees, 12 minutes, 23 seconds east, 1208.49 feet;
thence north 43 degrees, 8 minutes, 28 seconds east, 905.77 feet; thence north
54 degrees, 19 minutes, 20 seconds east, 731.56 feet; thence north 57 degrees,
13 minutes, 41 seconds east, 684.45 feet; thence north 56 degrees, 14 minutes,
20 seconds east, 120.34 feet; thence north 53 degrees, 9 minutes, 36 seconds
east, 598.24 feet; thence north 62 degrees, 7 minutes, 10 seconds east, 707.55
feet; thence north 59 degrees, 58 minutes, 43 seconds east, 563.34 feet; thence
north 49 degrees, 11 minutes, 46 seconds east, 482.37 feet; thence north 57
degrees, 18 minutes, 21 seconds east, 762.06 feet; thence north 71 degrees,
32 minutes, 53 seconds east, 481.69 feet; thence north 61 degrees, 27 minutes,
48 seconds east, 250.65 feet and ending at a point that is perpendicular to
the northeast corner of government lot 5 of section 23, township 15 north,
range 4 west of the sixth principal meridian, Polk County, Nebraska; thence
continuing on the county line between Polk and Merrick counties adjacent to
section 24, township 15 north, range 4 west of the sixth principal meridian,
Polk County, Nebraska, described as follows: Commencing at the northeast corner
of government lot 5 of section 23, township 15 north, range 4 west of the
sixth principal meridian, Polk County, Nebraska, and assuming the east line
of said government lot 5 to have a bearing of south 0 degrees, 1 minute, 56
seconds east; thence north 28 degrees, 32 minutes, 12 seconds west, and perpendicular
to the geographical centerline of the Platte River, 1225.57 feet to the point
of beginning, said point being on said geographical centerline; the next 5
courses on said geographical centerline; thence north 61 degrees, 27 minutes,
48 seconds east, 759.65 feet; thence north 54 degrees, 45 minutes, 25 seconds
east, 1538.51 feet; thence north 58 degrees, 5 minutes, 44 seconds east, 1675.34
feet; thence north 53 degrees, 15 minutes, 23 seconds east, 1844.73 feet;
thence north 46 degrees, 46 minutes, 34 seconds east, 622.22 feet and ending
at a point that is perpendicular to the northeast corner of government lot
1 of said section 24, township 15 north, range 4 west of the sixth principal
meridian, Polk County, Nebraska; thence continuing on the county line between
Polk and Merrick counties adjacent to sections 17, 18, and 19, township 15
north, range 3 west of the sixth principal meridian, Polk County, Nebraska,
described as follows: Commencing at the northeast corner of government lot
1 of section 24, township 15 north, range 4 west of the sixth principal meridian,
Polk County, Nebraska, and assuming the north line of government lot 1 of
section 17, township 15 north, range 3 west of the sixth principal meridian,
Polk County, Nebraska, to have a bearing of north 56 degrees, 3 minutes, 25
seconds east; thence north 43 degrees, 13 minutes, 26 seconds west, and perpendicular
to the geographical centerline of the Platte River, 901.44 feet to the point
of beginning, said point being on the geographical centerline; the next 12
courses on said geographical centerline; thence north 46 degrees, 46 minutes,
34 seconds east, 347.92 feet; thence north 52 degrees, 38 minutes, 26 seconds
east, 626.31 feet; thence north 41 degrees, 44 minutes, 8 seconds east, 334.55
feet; thence north 51 degrees, 2 minutes, 44 seconds east, 972.55 feet; thence
north 40 degrees, 15 minutes, 33 seconds east, 731.79 feet; thence north 36
degrees, 26 minutes, 23 seconds east, 970.59 feet; thence north 36 degrees,
32 minutes, 36 seconds east, 908.72 feet; thence north 58 degrees, 27 minutes,
57 seconds east, 258.30 feet; thence north 42 degrees, 48 minutes, 50 seconds
east, 367.48 feet; thence north 43 degrees, 54 minutes, 57 seconds east, 2682.73
feet; thence north 41 degrees, 38 minutes, 34 seconds east, 398.76 feet; thence
north 40 degrees, 45 minutes, 24 seconds east, 416.25 feet and ending at a
point that is perpendicular to the northeast corner of government lot 1 of
said section 17, township 15 north, range 3 west of the sixth principal meridian,
Polk County, Nebraska; thence continuing on the county line between Polk and
Merrick counties adjacent to sections 8 and 9, township 15 north, range 3
west of the sixth principal meridian, Polk County, Nebraska, described as
follows: Commencing at the southwest corner of lot 5 of said section 8, and
assuming the south line of said lot 5 to have a bearing of south 89 degrees,
33 minutes, 8 seconds east; thence north 49 degrees, 14 minutes, 36 seconds
west, and perpendicular to the geographical centerline of the Platte River,
1386.78 feet to the point of beginning, said point being on the geographical
centerline of said Platte River; the next 26 courses on said geographical
centerline; thence north 59 degrees, 9 minutes, 30 seconds east, 435.97 feet;
thence north 41 degrees, 24 minutes, 58 seconds east, 144.83 feet; thence
north 45 degrees, 47 minutes, 4 seconds east, 298.37 feet; thence north 44
degrees, 1 minute, 35 seconds east, 399.35 feet; thence north 31 degrees,
41 minutes, 6 seconds east, 220.66 feet; thence north 29 degrees, 20 minutes,
52 seconds east, 420.71 feet; thence north 46 degrees, 4 minutes, 0 seconds
east, 343.05 feet; thence north 39 degrees, 58 minutes, 42 seconds east, 489.14
feet; thence north 30 degrees, 8 minutes, 23 seconds east, 370.70 feet; thence
north 47 degrees, 40 minutes, 21 seconds east, 243.26 feet; thence north 49
degrees, 27 minutes, 19 seconds east, 381.66 feet; thence north 42 degrees,
43 minutes, 37 seconds east, 193.07 feet; thence north 47 degrees, 54 minutes,
34 seconds east, 171.32 feet; thence north 47 degrees, 54 minutes, 34 seconds
east, 299.06 feet; thence north 54 degrees, 43 minutes, 13 seconds east, 293.59
feet; thence north 47 degrees, 48 minutes, 38 seconds east, 273.99 feet; thence
north 60 degrees, 50 minutes, 29 seconds east, 259.30 feet; thence north 43
degrees, 34 minutes, 13 seconds east, 647.78 feet; thence north 43 degrees,
34 minutes, 13 seconds east, 308.91 feet; thence north 33 degrees, 44 minutes,
23 seconds east, 205.67 feet; thence north 42 degrees, 59 minutes, 37 seconds
east, 103.53 feet; thence north 49 degrees, 59 minutes, 5 seconds east, 573.10
feet; thence north 48 degrees, 3 minutes, 27 seconds east, 250.06 feet; thence
north 55 degrees, 30 minutes, 20 seconds east, 251.45 feet; thence north 36
degrees, 29 minutes, 4 seconds east, 256.44 feet; thence north 50 degrees,
34 minutes, 37 seconds east, 170.89 feet and ending at a point that is perpendicular
to the southwest corner of government lot 4 of section 4, township 15 north,
range 3 west of the sixth principal meridian, Polk County, Nebraska; thence
continuing on the county line between Polk and Merrick counties adjacent to
section 4, township 15 north, range 3 west of the sixth principal meridian,
Polk County, Nebraska, described as follows: Commencing at the southwest corner
of lot 4 of said section 4, and assuming the south line of said lot 4 to have
a bearing of south 89 degrees, 38 minutes, 18 seconds east; thence north 39
degrees, 25 minutes, 23 seconds west, and perpendicular to the geographical
centerline of the Platte River, 1662.07 feet to the point of beginning, said
point being on said geographical centerline; the next 7 courses on said geographical
centerline; thence north 53 degrees, 46 minutes, 58 seconds east, 330.14 feet;
thence north 58 degrees, 57 minutes, 3 seconds east, 253.55 feet; thence north
44 degrees, 28 minutes, 51 seconds east, 250.91 feet; thence north 50 degrees,
4 minutes, 7 seconds east, 250.02 feet; thence north 56 degrees, 38 minutes,
46 seconds east, 252.04 feet; thence north 45 degrees, 40 minutes, 51 seconds
east, 250.51 feet; thence north 43 degrees, 26 minutes, 50 seconds east, 286.41
feet to a point on the west line of north thunderbird lake subdivision extended
north; thence south 33 degrees, 33 minutes, 56 seconds east, and on the west
line of said subdivision, 1762.06 feet to the southwest corner of said subdivision;
thence north 52 degrees, 27 minutes, 34 seconds east, and on the south line
of said subdivision, 258.17 feet; thence north 50 degrees, 24 minutes, 39
seconds east, and on the south line of said subdivision, 784.82 feet; thence
north 4 degrees, 21 minutes, 44 seconds east, and on the south line of said
subdivision, 229.01 feet; thence north 50 degrees, 51 minutes, 33 seconds
east, 509.80 feet; thence north 6 degrees, 13 minutes, 43 seconds west, and
on the south line of said subdivision, 284.97 feet; thence north 67 degrees,
25 minutes, 50 seconds east, 902.92 feet to a point on the west right-of-way
line of said highway number 39; thence north 23 degrees, 0 minutes, 50 seconds
west, and on the west right-of-way line of said highway number 39, 226.15
feet; thence north 23 degrees, 41 minutes, 10 seconds west, and on the west
right-of-way line of said highway number 39, 305.60 feet; thence north 33
degrees, 36 minutes, 5 seconds west, and on the west right-of-way line of
said highway number 39, 305.56 feet; thence north 23 degrees, 14 minutes,
0 seconds west, and on the west right-of-way line of said highway number 39,
299.38 feet; thence north 22 degrees, 6 minutes, 20 seconds west, and on the
west right-of-way line of said highway number 39, 116.44 feet; thence north
67 degrees, 53 minutes, 40 seconds east, 260.58 feet and ending at a point
on the west line of tri-lakes subdivision, said point being 56.75 feet southeast
of the northwest corner of said subdivision; thence continuing on the county
line between Polk and Merrick counties in section 3, township 15 north, range
3 west of the sixth principal meridian, Polk County, Nebraska, described as
follows: Beginning at a point on the west line of tri-lakes subdivision, said
point being 56.75 feet southeast of the northwest corner of said subdivision,
and assuming the west line of said subdivision to have a bearing of south
22 degrees, 58 minutes, 33 seconds east; thence north 67 degrees, 53 minutes,
40 seconds east, 2957.56 feet to a point on an agreed upon boundary line;
thence south 26 degrees, 56 minutes, 23 seconds east, and on said agreed upon
boundary line, 1196.15 feet; thence north 87 degrees, 51 minutes, 49 seconds
east, 1981.62 feet to a point on the thread of stream of the south channel
of the Platte River; thence south 89 degrees, 37 minutes, 0 seconds east,
and on said thread of stream, 624.91 feet and ending at the east line of said
section 3; thence continuing on the county line between Polk and Merrick counties
in section 2, township 15 north, range 3 west of the sixth principal meridian,
Polk County, Nebraska, and in sections 30 and 31, township 16 north, range
2 west of the sixth principal meridian, Polk County, Nebraska, and in sections
35 and 36, township 16 north, range 3 west of the sixth principal meridian,
Polk County, Nebraska, described as follows: Commencing at a point on the
west line of tri-lakes subdivision, said point being 56.75 feet southeast
of the northwest corner of said subdivision, and assuming the west line of
said subdivision to have a bearing of south 22 degrees, 58 minutes, 33 seconds
east; thence north 67 degrees, 53 minutes, 40 seconds east, 2957.56 feet to
a point on an agreed upon boundary line; thence south 26 degrees, 56 minutes,
23 seconds east, and on said agreed upon boundary line, 1196.15 feet; thence
north 87 degrees, 51 minutes, 49 seconds east, 1981.62 feet to a point on
the thread of stream of the south channel of the Platte River; thence south
89 degrees, 37 minutes, 0 seconds east, and on said thread of stream, 624.91
feet to the point of beginning, said point being on the west line of said
section 2; the next 13 courses on the thread of stream of the south channel
of the Platte River; thence north 76 degrees, 31 minutes, 56 seconds east,
1282.77 feet; thence north 64 degrees, 49 minutes, 59 seconds east, 1003.62
feet; thence north 66 degrees, 16 minutes, 54 seconds east, 771.67 feet; thence
north 64 degrees, 24 minutes, 8 seconds east, 987.84 feet; thence north 62
degrees, 32 minutes, 13 seconds east, 765.60 feet; thence north 82 degrees,
40 minutes, 10 seconds east, 881.63 feet; thence north 66 degrees, 25 minutes,
46 seconds east, 407.59 feet; thence north 51 degrees, 51 minutes, 31 seconds
east, 644.83 feet; thence north 62 degrees, 11 minutes, 14 seconds east, 438.62
feet; thence north 79 degrees, 50 minutes, 8 seconds east, 1220.74 feet; thence
north 68 degrees, 59 minutes, 38 seconds east, 1125.78 feet; thence north
58 degrees, 55 minutes, 8 seconds east, 1012.63 feet; thence north 73 degrees,
48 minutes, 20 seconds east, 926.49 feet to the east line of section 36, township
16 north, range 3 west of the sixth principal meridian, Polk County, Nebraska;
thence north on the dividing line between ranges two and three west to the
south bank of the north channel of the Platte River; thence northeasterly
along the south bank of said Platte River to the east line of range 1 west;
thence south, and on the east line of range 1 west to the southeast corner
of township thirteen north, range one west; thence west on the south line
of township 13 north, to the point of beginning.

Laws 2009, LB131, § 2.